Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF57.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 125A.76, subdivision 2e, is amended to read: Subd. 2e. Cross subsidy reduction aid. (a) A school district's annual cross subsidy reduction aid equals the school district's initial special education cross subsidy for the previous fiscal year times the cross subsidy aid factor for that fiscal year. (b) The cross subsidy aid factor equals deleted text begin 6.43 percent for fiscal year 2023;deleted text end 44 percent for fiscal years 2024deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin andnew text end 2025deleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin ; 50 percent for fiscal yearnew text end 2026; and deleted text begin 50deleted text end new text begin 54new text end percent for fiscal year 2027 and later. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for special education aid for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; SPECIAL EDUCATION AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Special education aid. new text end new text begin For special education aid under Minnesota Statutes, sections 125A.76 and 125A.79: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end